Utah statutes.
73-28-401.   Analysis of benefits and costs -- Allocation of costs.
(1)  The board shall allocate project costs based on the economic costs and
benefits of the developed water and electricity among the following water
uses:
(a)  municipal and industrial;
(b)  electricity;
(c)  public recreation; and
(d)  fish and wildlife.
(2)  The state shall pay the nonreimbursable project costs allocated to
recreation and fish and wildlife.
